Utah statutes.
23-19-8.   Signature on documents -- Considered under oath -- Prohibition on
use of unsigned documents.
(1)  A person's signature on a license, permit, tag, or certificate of
registration is certification of that person's eligibility to use the license,
permit, tag, or certificate of registration for the purpose intended by this
title.
(2)  The signature need not be notarized but shall be considered to be made
under oath.
(3)  A person may not use an unsigned license, permit, tag, or certificate of
registration.
